New Jersey, session 221, S1759.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   As used in this act, public record shall have the same meaning as P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.). b.    The name, address, and identity of a health care worker who is a victim of an alleged assault or aggravated assault while engaged in the duties of providing direct patient care or practicing the health care profession shall not appear on the indictment, complaint, or any other public record if the actor is a patient or resident at the health care facility and the victim is: (1)   a health care worker employed by a licensed health care facility to provide direct patient care; (2)   a health care professional licensed or otherwise authorized pursuant to Title 26 or Title 45 of the Revised Statutes to practice a health care profession; or (3)   a direct care worker at a State or county psychiatric hospital or State developmental center or veterans' memorial home. The information shall be omitted or redacted, or initials or a fictitious name shall appear instead. c.     Any report, statement, photograph, court document, indictment, complaint or any other public record which states the name, address and identity of a victim shall be confidential and unavailable to the public.  Unless authorized pursuant to a court order, any person who purposefully discloses, releases or otherwise makes available to the public any document listed in subsection a. of this section which contains the name, address, and identity of a victim shall be guilty of a disorderly persons offense. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.